Utah statutes.
41-1a-113.   Power to summon witnesses and take testimony -- Service of summons -- Witness fees -- Failure to appear.

(1)  The commission and officers of the division designated by the commission may summon witnesses to give testimony under oath or to give written deposition upon any matter under the jurisdiction of the division.

(2)  The summons may require the production of relevant books, papers, or records.

(3)  Every summons shall be served at least five days before the return date, either by personal service made by any person over 18 years of age or by registered mail, but return acknowledgment is required to prove the latter service.

(4)  The fees for the attendance and travel of witnesses are the same as for witnesses before the district court.

(5)  Failure to obey a summons served is a class C misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

